Washington statutes.
RCW 36.13.020

County census authorized.

The legislative authority of any county may order a county census to be taken of all the inhabitants of the county. The expense of such census enumeration shall be paid from the county current expense fund.

[ 1991 c 363 s 44; 1977 ex.s. c 110 s 6; 1963 c 4 s 36.13.020. Prior: (i) 1923 c 177 s 1; RRS s 4200-6. (ii) 1923 c 177 s 5; RRS s 4200-10.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.